Tennessee, session 114, SB1713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-427, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) The executive head of each department, agency, or other unit of state
government subject to this section shall submit an annual attestation of compliance with
subsection (a) to the comptroller of the treasury not later than January 1, 2027, and each
January 1 thereafter.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-1-135, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) The executive head of each county government subject to this section shall
submit an annual attestation of compliance with subsection (a) to the comptroller of the
treasury not later than January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-54-150, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) The executive head of each municipal government subject to this section
shall submit an annual attestation of compliance with subsection (a) to the comptroller of
the treasury not later than January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-3-107, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
SB1713
010704
- 1 -

(c) The executive head of each metropolitan government subject to this section
shall submit an annual attestation of compliance with subsection (a) to the comptroller of
the treasury not later than January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-192, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) The executive head or president of each public institution of higher education
subject to this section shall submit an annual attestation of compliance with subsection
(a) to the comptroller of the treasury not later than January 1, 2027, and each January 1
thereafter.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010704